src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/es.aff
SFX   ostrar u strenmelas ostrar
SFX   ostrar u strenmelo ostrar
SFX   ostrar u strenmelos ostrar
SFX   ostrar u strennosla ostrar
SFX   ostrar u strennoslas ostrar
SFX   ostrar u strennoslo ostrar
SFX   ostrar u strennoslos ostrar
SFX   ostrar u strenosla ostrar
SFX   ostrar u strenoslas ostrar
SFX   ostrar u strenoslo ostrar
SFX   ostrar u strenoslos ostrar
SFX   ostrar u strensela ostrar
SFX   ostrar u strenselas ostrar
SFX   ostrar u strenselo ostrar
SFX   ostrar u strenselos ostrar
SFX   ostrar u stresela ostrar
SFX   ostrar u streselas ostrar
SFX   ostrar u streselo ostrar
SFX   ostrar u streselos ostrar

SFX   Y 128
SFX   aber  pala aber
SFX   aber  palas aber
SFX   aber  palo aber
SFX   aber  palos aber
SFX   aber  panla aber
SFX   aber  panlas aber
SFX   aber  panlo aber
SFX   aber  panlos aber
SFX   acer  gala acer
SFX   acer  galas acer
SFX   acer  galo acer
SFX   acer  galos acer
SFX   acer  ganla acer
SFX   acer  ganlas acer
SFX   acer  ganlo acer
SFX   acer  ganlos acer
SFX   aer  igala aer
SFX   aer  igalas aer
SFX   aer  igalo aer
SFX   aer  igalos aer
SFX   aer  iganla aer
SFX   aer  iganlas aer
SFX   aer  iganlo aer
SFX   aer  iganlos aer
SFX   ecir  gala ecir
SFX   ecir  galas ecir
SFX   ecir  galo ecir
SFX   ecir  galos ecir
SFX   ecir  ganla ecir
SFX   ecir  ganlas ecir
SFX   ecir  ganlo ecir
SFX   ecir  ganlos ecir
SFX   edir  dala edir
SFX   edir  dalas edir
SFX   edir  dalo edir
SFX   edir  dalos edir
SFX   edir  danla edir
SFX   edir  danlas edir
SFX   edir  danlo edir
SFX   edir  danlos edir
SFX   eguir  gala eguir
SFX   eguir  galas eguir
SFX   eguir  galo eguir
SFX   eguir  galos eguir
SFX   eguir  ganla eguir
SFX   eguir  ganlas eguir
SFX   eguir  ganlo eguir
SFX   eguir  ganlos eguir
SFX   e r  ala e r
SFX   e r  alas e r
SFX   e r  alo e r
SFX   e r  alos e r
SFX   e r  anla e r
SFX   e r  anlas e r
SFX   e r  anlo e r
SFX   e r  anlos e r
SFX   ener  ngala ener
SFX   ener  ngalas ener
SFX   ener  ngalo ener
SFX   ener  ngalos ener
SFX   ener  nganla ener
SFX   ener  nganlas ener
SFX   ener  nganlo ener
SFX   ener  nganlos ener
SFX   entir i ntala entir
SFX   entir i ntalas entir
SFX   entir i ntalo entir
SFX   entir i ntalos entir
SFX   entir i ntanla entir
SFX   entir i ntanlas entir
SFX   entir i ntanlo entir
SFX   entir i ntanlos entir
SFX   er  ala ver
SFX   er  alas ver
SFX   er  alo ver
SFX   er  alos ver
SFX   er  anla ver
SFX   er  anlas ver
SFX   er  anlo ver
SFX   er  anlos ver
SFX   erer i rala erer
SFX   erer i ralas erer
SFX   erer i ralo erer
SFX   erer i ralos erer
SFX   erer i ranla erer
SFX   erer i ranlas erer
SFX   erer i ranlo erer
SFX   erer i ranlos erer
SFX   ervir  rvala ervir
SFX   ervir  rvalas ervir
SFX   ervir  rvalo ervir
SFX   ervir  rvalos ervir
SFX   ervir  rvanla ervir
SFX   ervir  rvanlas ervir
SFX   ervir  rvanlo ervir
SFX   ervir  rvanlos ervir
SFX   oner  ngala oner
SFX   oner  ngalas oner
SFX   oner  ngalo oner
SFX   oner  ngalos oner
SFX   oner  nganla oner
SFX   oner  nganlas oner
SFX   oner  nganlo oner
SFX   oner  nganlos oner
SFX   rir  rala rir
SFX   rir  ralas rir
SFX   rir  ralo rir
SFX   rir  ralos rir
SFX   rir  ranla rir
SFX   rir  ranlas rir
SFX   rir  ranlo rir
SFX   rir  ranlos rir
SFX   ucir  zcalas ucir
SFX   ucir  zcala ucir
SFX   ucir  zcalos ucir
SFX   ucir  zcalo ucir
SFX   ucir  zcanlas ucir
SFX   ucir  zcanla ucir
SFX   ucir  zcanlos ucir
SFX   ucir  zcanlo ucir
SFX   uir  yalas uir
SFX   uir  yala uir
SFX   uir  yalos uir
SFX   uir  yalo uir
SFX   uir  yanlas uir
SFX   uir  yanla uir
SFX   uir  yanlos uir
SFX   uir  yanlo uir

SFX   Y 28
SFX   acer  game acer
SFX   acer  ganme acer
SFX   acer  gannos acer
SFX   acer  ganos acer
SFX   aer  igame aer
SFX   aer  iganme aer
SFX   aer  igannos aer
SFX   aer  iganos aer
SFX   ecir  game ecir
SFX   ecir  ganme ecir
SFX   ecir  gannos ecir
SFX   ecir  ganos ecir
SFX   edir  dame edir
SFX   edir  danme edir
SFX   edir  dannos edir
SFX   edir  danos edir
SFX   eguir  game eguir
SFX   eguir  ganme eguir
SFX   eguir  gannos eguir
SFX   eguir  ganos eguir
SFX   er  ame ver
SFX   er  anme ver
SFX   er  annos ver
SFX   er  anos ver
SFX   ervir  rvame ervir
SFX   ervir  rvanme ervir
SFX   ervir  rvannos ervir
SFX   ervir  rvanos ervir

SFX   Y 20
SFX   acer  gale acer
SFX   acer  gales acer
SFX   acer  ganle acer
SFX   acer  ganles acer
SFX   ecir  gale ecir
SFX   ecir  gales ecir
SFX   ecir  ganle ecir
SFX   ecir  ganles ecir
SFX   edir  dale edir
SFX   edir  dales edir
SFX   edir  danle edir
SFX   edir  danles edir
SFX   er  ale ver
SFX   er  ales ver
SFX   er  anle ver
SFX   er  anles ver
SFX   oner  ngale oner
SFX   oner  ngales oner
SFX   oner  nganle oner
SFX   oner  nganles oner

SFX   Y 72
SFX   aer  igamela aer
SFX   aer  igamelas aer
SFX   aer  igamelo aer
SFX   aer  igamelos aer
SFX   aer  iganmela aer
SFX   aer  iganmelas aer
SFX   aer  iganmelo aer
SFX   aer  iganmelos aer
SFX   aer  igannosla aer
SFX   aer  igannoslas aer
SFX   aer  igannoslo aer
SFX   aer  igannoslos aer
SFX   aer  iganosla aer
SFX   aer  iganoslas aer
SFX   aer  iganoslo aer
SFX   aer  iganoslos aer
SFX   aer  igansela aer
SFX   aer  iganselas aer
SFX   aer  iganselo aer
SFX   aer  iganselos aer
SFX   aer  igasela aer
SFX   aer  igaselas aer
SFX   aer  igaselo aer
SFX   aer  igaselos aer
SFX   ecir  gamela ecir
SFX   ecir  gamelas ecir
SFX   ecir  gamelo ecir
SFX   ecir  gamelos ecir
SFX   ecir  ganmela ecir
SFX   ecir  ganmelas ecir
SFX   ecir  ganmelo ecir
SFX   ecir  ganmelos ecir
SFX   ecir  gannosla ecir
SFX   ecir  gannoslas ecir
SFX   ecir  gannoslo ecir
SFX   ecir  gannoslos ecir
SFX   ecir  ganosla ecir
SFX   ecir  ganoslas ecir
SFX   ecir  ganoslo ecir
SFX   ecir  ganoslos ecir
SFX   ecir  gansela ecir
SFX   ecir  ganselas ecir
SFX   ecir  ganselo ecir
SFX   ecir  ganselos ecir
SFX   ecir  gasela ecir
SFX   ecir  gaselas ecir
SFX   ecir  gaselo ecir
SFX   ecir  gaselos ecir
SFX   ertir i rtamela ertir
SFX   ertir i rtamelas ertir
SFX   ertir i rtamelo ertir
SFX   ertir i rtamelos ertir
SFX   ertir i rtanmela ertir
SFX   ertir i rtanmelas ertir
SFX   ertir i rtanmelo ertir
SFX   ertir i rtanmelos ertir
SFX   ertir i rtannosla ertir
SFX   ertir i rtannoslas ertir
SFX   ertir i rtannoslo ertir
SFX   ertir i rtannoslos ertir
SFX   ertir i rtanosla ertir
SFX   ertir i rtanoslas ertir
SFX   ertir i rtanoslo ertir
SFX   ertir i rtanoslos ertir
SFX   ertir i rtansela ertir
SFX   ertir i rtanselas ertir
SFX   ertir i rtanselo ertir
SFX   ertir i rtanselos ertir
SFX   ertir i rtasela ertir
SFX   ertir i rtaselas ertir
SFX   ertir i rtaselo ertir
SFX   ertir i rtaselos ertir

SFX   Y 4
SFX   0 me r
SFX   0 te r
SFX   0 nos r
SFX   0 os r

SFX   Y 16
SFX   ar  ndome ar
SFX   ar  ndonos ar
SFX   ar  ndoos ar
SFX   ar  ndote ar
SFX   er i ndome [^ae]er
SFX   er i ndonos [^ae]er
SFX   er i ndoos [^ae]er
SFX   er i ndote [^ae]er
SFX   er y ndome [ae]er
SFX   er y ndonos [ae]er
SFX   er y ndoos [ae]er
SFX   er y ndote [ae]er
SFX   r  ndome ir
SFX   r  ndonos ir
SFX   r  ndoos ir
SFX   r  ndote ir

SFX   Y 72
SFX   ecir ici ndome ecir
SFX   ecir ici ndonos ecir
SFX   ecir ici ndoos ecir
SFX   ecir ici ndote ecir
SFX   edir idi ndome edir
SFX   edir idi ndonos edir
SFX   edir idi ndoos edir
SFX   edir idi ndote edir
SFX   eguir igui ndome eguir
SFX   eguir igui ndonos eguir
SFX   eguir igui ndoos eguir
SFX   eguir igui ndote eguir
SFX   e r i ndome e r
SFX   e r i ndonos e r
SFX   e r i ndoos e r
SFX   e r i ndote e r
SFX   enir ini ndome enir
SFX   enir ini ndonos enir
SFX   enir ini ndoos enir
SFX   enir ini ndote enir
SFX   entir inti ndome entir
SFX   entir inti ndonos entir
SFX   entir inti ndoos entir
SFX   entir inti ndote entir
SFX   e ir i  ndome e ir
SFX   e ir i  ndonos e ir
SFX   e ir i  ndoos e ir
SFX   e ir i  ndote e ir
SFX   er i ndome ver
SFX   er i ndonos ver
SFX   er i ndoos ver
SFX   er i ndote ver
SFX   erir iri ndome erir
SFX   erir iri ndonos erir
SFX   erir iri ndoos erir
SFX   erir iri ndote erir
